District of Columbia statutes.
6-903

Condemnation procedure; occupancy of condemned buildings.

Whenever the Board for the Condemnation of Insanitary Buildings shall find that any building or part of building is in such habitable or sanitary condition as to endanger the health or lives of the occupants thereof or persons living in the vicinity, the owner of such building shall be served with a notice requiring him to show cause, within a time to be specified in such notice, why such building or part of building should not be condemned. The time to be fixed in such notice shall not be less than 5 days, exclusive of Sundays and legal holidays, after the date of service of said notice, unless the Board shall find that the uninhabitable or insanitary condition of such building or part of building is such as to cause immediate danger to the health or lives of the occupants thereof or of persons living in the vicinity, in which case a lesser time may be specified in said notice. If within the time to show cause fixed by the Board, the owner shall fail to show cause sufficient in the opinion of the Board to prevent the condemnation of such building or part of building, the Board shall issue an order condemning such building or part of building and ordering the same to be put into habitable or sanitary condition or to be demolished and removed within a time to be specified in said order of condemnation, and shall cause a copy of such order to be served on the owner and a copy to be affixed to the building or part of building condemned. The Board shall give the owner reasonable time within which to put the building in habitable or sanitary condition, but such time shall be not less 30 days after the date of service of said order on said owner, unless the Board shall find that the condition of said premises is such as to cause immediate danger to the health or lives of the occupants thereof or of persons living in the vicinity, in which event the Board may fix a lesser time. From and after 15 days, exclusive of Sundays or legal holidays, or within such additional time as may be fixed by the Board, after a copy of any order of condemnation has been affixed to any condemned building or part of building, no person shall occupy such building or part of building.

History

May 1, 1906, 34 Stat. 157, ch. 2073, § 3
Aug. 28, 1954, 68 Stat. 885, ch. 1032
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 103(c), 48 DCR 1888
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 13, 49 DCR 8140
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 2072(b), 51 DCR 8441

Cross References

Penalties for violation, see § 6-916.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-916, § 6-919, and § 8-411.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-703.
1973 Ed., § 5-618.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-281 substituted “5 days” for “ten days”, substituted “60 days” for “not less than six months”, substituted “habitable or sanitary condition” for “sanitary condition”, and substituted “uninhabitable or insanitary condition” for “insanitary condition”.
D.C. Law 14-213 validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 15-205 substituted “30 days” for “60 days”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2072(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2072(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).